Missouri, session 2026, HB2882.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 135.588, to read as follows:
135.588. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Contribution", a donation of cash, stock, bonds, or other marketable
securities, or real property valued at the current property tax-assessed valuation of the
property. If a property has not been assessed or has no assessed valuation, no credit
shall be authorized for the donation of the property;
(2) "Department", the department of mental health;
(3) "Director", the director of the department of mental health;
(4) "Qualified organization", an organization or other nonprofit entity located
in this state that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that provides a comprehensive array of mental
health services, rehabilitation, support, and assistance to veterans with mental health
disorders through licensed mental health professionals in compliance with Missouri
statutes or other alternative treatments or services determined by the department;
(5) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
(6) "Taxpayer", any individual, firm, partner in a firm, corporation,
shareholder in an S corporation, or other entity doing business in this state, subject
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2882 2
to the state income tax imposed under chapter 143, excluding the withholding tax
imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265, who makes a contribution to a qualified
organization.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a taxpayer shall be
allowed to claim a tax credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an amount equal
to seventy percent of the taxpayer's total contribution or contributions to qualified
organizations.
3. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall not exceed the amount of the
taxpayer's state tax liability for the tax year for which the credit is claimed, and such
taxpayer shall not be allowed to claim a tax credit in excess of fifty thousand dollars per
tax year.
4. Tax credits issued under the provisions of this section shall not be refundable;
however, any tax credit that cannot be claimed for the tax year in which the contribution
was made may be carried forward one succeeding tax year. No tax credit claimed under
this section shall be assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed.
5. Except for any excess credit that is carried over under the provisions of
subsection 4 of this section, a taxpayer shall not be allowed to claim a tax credit unless
the total amount of such taxpayer's contribution or contributions to qualified
organizations for the tax year has a value of at least one hundred dollars.
6. The director shall determine, at least annually, which organizations in this
state may be classified as qualified organizations. The director may require an
organization seeking to be classified as a qualified organization to provide any
information that is reasonably necessary to make such a determination. The director
shall classify an organization as a qualified organization if such organization meets the
definition set forth under subsection 1 of this section and any additional requirements
that the department may establish by rule.
7. The director shall establish a procedure, in consultation with the department
of revenue, by which a taxpayer can determine if a organization has been classified as a
qualified organization.
8. Upon receipt and acceptance of a contribution from a taxpayer, a qualified
organization shall issue to the taxpayer a statement evidencing the receipt of such
contribution, including the monetary value of such contribution. A qualified
organization shall be permitted to decline a contribution from a taxpayer.
9. Each qualified organization shall provide information to the department of
revenue concerning the identity of each taxpayer making a contribution to the qualified
organization who is claiming a tax credit under this section and the amount of the
contribution.

HB 2882 3
10. Notwithstanding any provisions of section 105.1500 to the contrary, any
requirement to provide information, documents, or records under this section, and any
requirement established by the director or the department of revenue to provide
information, documents, or records for the purpose of administering and enforcing this
section, shall be exempt from section 105.1500.
11. The director, in consultation with the department of revenue and the
Missouri veterans commission, may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for
the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined
in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
12. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset; and
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a taxpayer from claiming a tax credit
properly issued before this program was sunset in a tax year after the program is sunset.
✔